Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9A.20.021 and 2015 c 265 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Felony. Unless a different maximum sentence for a classified felony is specifically established by a statute of this state, no person convicted of a classified felony shall be punished by confinement or fine exceeding the following:(a) For a class A felony, by confinement in a state correctional institution for a term of life imprisonment, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of ((fifty thousand dollars))$50,000, or by both such confinement and fine;(b) For a class B felony, by confinement in a state correctional institution for a term of ((ten))10 years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of ((twenty thousand dollars))$20,000, or by both such confinement and fine;(c) For a class C felony, by confinement in a state correctional institution for five years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of ((ten thousand dollars))$10,000, or by both such confinement and fine.(2) Gross misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a gross misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment or fine as follows:(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, every person shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of up to ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than ((five thousand dollars))$5,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine.(b) Every person convicted of assault in the fourth degree under the circumstances described in RCW 9A.36.041(4) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of up to 365 days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than $5,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine.(3) Misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more than ((ninety))90 days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine.(4) This section applies to only those crimes committed on or after July 1, 1984.(5) The fines in this section apply to adult offenders only.Sec. 2. RCW 9A.36.041 and 2021 c 215 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of assault in the fourth degree if, under circumstances not amounting to assault in the first, second, or third degree, or custodial assault, he or she assaults another.(2) ((Assault in the fourth degree is a gross misdemeanor, except))Except as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, assault in the fourth degree is a gross misdemeanor punishable by a maximum term fixed by the court of up to 364 days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than $5,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine.(3)(a) Assault in the fourth degree occurring after July 23, 2017, and before March 18, 2020, where domestic violence is pleaded and proven, is a class C felony if the person has two or more prior adult convictions within ((ten))10 years for any of the following offenses occurring after July 23, 2017, where domestic violence was pleaded and proven:(i) Repetitive domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;(ii) Crime of harassment as defined by RCW 9A.46.060;(iii) Assault in the third degree;(iv) Assault in the second degree;(v) Assault in the first degree; or(vi) A municipal, tribal, federal, or out-of-state offense comparable to any offense under (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection.For purposes of this subsection (3)(a), "family or household members" for purposes of the definition of "domestic violence" means spouses, domestic partners, former spouses, former domestic partners, persons who have a child in common regardless of whether they have been married or have lived together at any time, persons ((sixteen))16 years of age or older who are presently residing together or who have resided together in the past and who have or have had a dating relationship, and persons ((sixteen))16 years of age or older with whom a person ((sixteen))16 years of age or older has or has had a dating relationship. "Family or household member" also includes an "intimate partner" as defined in RCW 10.99.020.(b) Assault in the fourth degree occurring on or after March 18, 2020, where domestic violence against an "intimate partner" as defined in RCW 10.99.020 is pleaded and proven, is a class C felony if the person has two or more prior adult convictions within ((ten))10 years for any of the following offenses occurring after July 23, 2017, where domestic violence against an "intimate partner" as defined in RCW 10.99.020 or domestic violence against a "family or household member" as defined in (a) of this subsection was pleaded and proven:(i) Repetitive domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;(ii) Crime of harassment as defined by RCW 9A.46.060;(iii) Assault in the third degree;(iv) Assault in the second degree;(v) Assault in the first degree; or(vi) A municipal, tribal, federal, or out-of-state offense comparable to any offense under (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection.(4)(a) Assault in the fourth degree occurring on or after the effective date of this section, and not constituting a class C felony under subsection (3) of this section, is punishable by a maximum term fixed by the court of up to 365 days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than $5,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine, if either:(i) Domestic violence is pleaded and proven; or(ii) There is a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835.(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as altering the elements of the offense, the pleading requirements for any special allegation, or the classification of the offense.Sec. 3. RCW 46.61.5055 and 2024 c 306 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 24 consecutive hours nor more than ((364))365 days. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court, in its discretion, may order not less than 15 days of electronic home monitoring or a 90-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device or other separate alcohol monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $350 nor more than $5,000. $350 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 48 consecutive hours nor more than ((364))365 days. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court, in its discretion, may order not less than 30 days of electronic home monitoring or a 120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program testing as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $5,000. $500 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.(2) One prior offense in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 30 days nor more than ((364))365 days and 60 days of electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and 60 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory term of imprisonment and electronic home monitoring under this subsection (2)(a)(i), the court may order a minimum of either 180 days of electronic home monitoring or a 120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $5,000. $500 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 45 days nor more than ((364))365 days and 90 days of electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and 90 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment and electronic home monitoring under this subsection (2)(b)(i), the court may order a minimum of either six months of electronic home monitoring or a 120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $750 nor more than $5,000. $750 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.(3) Two prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 90 days nor more than ((364))365 days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and 120 days of electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and 120 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory minimum term of 90 days of imprisonment and 120 days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order 360 days of electronic home monitoring or a 360-day period of 24/7 sobriety monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000. $1,000 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 120 days nor more than ((364))365 days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and 150 days of electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and 150 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory minimum term of 120 days of imprisonment and 150 days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order 360 days of electronic home monitoring or a 360-day period of 24/7 sobriety monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $1,500 ((dollars)) nor more than $5,000. $1,500 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.(4) Three or more prior offenses in 15 years. A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if:(a) The person has three or more prior offenses within 15 years; or(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:(i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(ii) A violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or(iv) A violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).(5) Monitoring. (a) Ignition interlock device. The court shall require any person convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to comply with the rules and requirements of the department regarding the installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.(b) Monitoring devices. If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any alcohol, the court may order the person to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's system. The person shall pay for the cost of the monitoring, unless the court specifies that the cost of monitoring will be paid with funds that are available from an alternative source identified by the court. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.(c) 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In any county or city where a 24/7 sobriety program is available and verified by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the court shall:(i) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in lieu of such period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring;(ii) Order the person to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section; or(iii) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in addition to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section.(6) Penalty for having a minor passenger in vehicle. If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 committed the offense while one or more passengers under the age of 16 were in the vehicle, the court shall:(a) Order the use of an ignition interlock or other device for an additional 12 months for each passenger under the age of 16 when the person is subject to the penalties under subsection (1)(a), (2)(a), or (3)(a) of this section; and order the use of an ignition interlock device for an additional 18 months for each passenger under the age of 16 when the person is subject to the penalties under subsection (1)(b), (2)(b), (3)(b), or (4) of this section;(b) In any case in which the person has no prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional 24 hours of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of 16, and a fine of not less than $1,000 and not more than $5,000 for each passenger under the age of 16. $1,000 of the fine for each passenger under the age of 16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;(c) In any case in which the person has one prior offense within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional five days of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of 16, and a fine of not less than $2,000 and not more than $5,000 for each passenger under the age of 16. One thousand dollars of the fine for each passenger under the age of 16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;(d) In any case in which the person has two prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional ((ten))10 days of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of 16, and a fine of not less than $3,000 and not more than $10,000 for each passenger under the age of 16. $1,000 of the fine for each passenger under the age of 16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.(7) Other items courts must consider while setting penalties. In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property;(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers;(c) Whether the driver was driving in the opposite direction of the normal flow of traffic on a multiple lane highway, as defined by RCW 46.04.350, with a posted speed limit of 45 miles per hour or greater; and(d) Whether a child passenger under the age of 16 was an occupant in the driver's vehicle.(8) Treatment and information school. An offender punishable under this section is subject to the substance use disorder assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.(9) Driver's license privileges of the defendant. (a) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:(i) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(A) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or denied by the department for 90 days or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a 90-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for fewer than two days;(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for less than one year; or(C) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;(ii) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:(A) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for one year or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a ((one hundred twenty))120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license revocation be for fewer than four days;(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for 900 days; or(C) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or(iii) Penalty for refusing to take test. If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(A) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years;(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years; or(C) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.(b)(i) The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection (9) for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.(ii) If a person has already served a suspension, revocation, or denial under RCW 46.20.3101 for a period equal to or greater than the period imposed under this subsection (9), the department shall provide notice of full credit, shall provide for no further suspension or revocation under this subsection provided the person has completed the requirements under RCW 46.20.311 and paid the probationary license fee under RCW 46.20.355 by the date specified in the notice under RCW 46.20.245, and shall impose no additional reissue fees for this credit.(c) Upon receipt of a notice from the court under RCW 36.28A.390 that a participant has been removed from a 24/7 sobriety program, the department must resume any suspension, revocation, or denial that had been terminated early under this subsection due to participation in the program, granting credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.20.3101 or this section arising out of the same incident.(d) Upon its own motion or upon motion by a person, a court may find, on the record, that notice to the department under RCW 46.20.270 has been delayed for three years or more as a result of a clerical or court error. If so, the court may order that the person's license, permit, or nonresident privilege shall not be revoked, suspended, or denied for that offense. The court shall send notice of the finding and order to the department and to the person. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the department shall not revoke, suspend, or deny the license, permit, or nonresident privilege of the person for that offense.(e) For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.(10) Probation of driving privilege. After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.(11) Conditions of probation. (a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes up to ((364))365 days in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state without proof of liability insurance or other financial responsibility for the future pursuant to RCW 46.30.020; (iii) not driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more or a THC concentration of 5.00 nanograms per milliliter of whole blood or higher, within two hours after driving; (iv) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol or drug concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drug; and (v) not driving a motor vehicle in this state without a functioning ignition interlock device as required by the department under RCW 46.20.720. The court may impose conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on the probationer's motor vehicle, substance use disorder treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined for 30 days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, for each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the court for 30 days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial then in effect shall be extended by 30 days. The court shall notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection. The person may apply for an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 during the suspension period.(ii) For each incident involving a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c), the court has discretion not to impose a suspension when the person provides the court with proof that the violation has been cured within 30 days. The court is not required to notify the department of the violation unless it is not cured within 30 days.(12) Waiver of electronic home monitoring. A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system. However, if a court determines that an alcohol monitoring device utilizing wireless reporting technology is reasonably available, the court may require the person to obtain such a device during the period of required electronic home monitoring;(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, use of an ignition interlock device, the 24/7 sobriety program monitoring, additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed ((364))365 days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed ((364))365 days.(13) Extraordinary medical placement. An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).(14) Definitions. For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.25.110 or an equivalent local ordinance;(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(1) or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;(vi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(vii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a careless or reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(viii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.09.470(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;(ix) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.10.490(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;(x) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(xi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(xii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;(xiii) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (x), (xi), or (xii) of this subsection if committed in this state;(xiv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance;(xv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;(xvi) A deferred prosecution granted in another state for a violation of driving or having physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the out-of-state deferred prosecution is equivalent to the deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, including a requirement that the defendant participate in a chemical dependency treatment program; or(xvii) A deferred sentence imposed in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred sentence was imposed was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or a violation of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;(b) "Treatment" means substance use disorder treatment licensed or certified by the department of health;(c) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current offense; and(d) "Within 15 years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within 15 years before or after the arrest for the current offense.(15) All fines imposed by this section apply to adult offenders only.--- END ---